Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 3. Minimum Wages

§ 381.
Declaration of policy.

It is the declared public policy of the State of Vermont that workers employed in any occupation should receive wages sufficient to provide adequate maintenance and to protect their health, and to be fairly commensurate with the value of the services rendered.

§ 382.
Coverage.

Employers employing two employees or more are covered by this subchapter.

§ 383.
Definitions.

Terms used in this subchapter have the following meanings, unless a different meaning is clearly apparent from the language or context:

“Commissioner,” the Commissioner of Labor or designee;

“Employee,” any individual employed or permitted to work by an employer except:

any individual employed in agriculture;

any individual employed in domestic service in or about a private home;

any individual employed by the United States;

any individual employed in the activities of a public supported nonprofit organization, except laundry employees, nurses’ aides, or practical nurses;

any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity;

any individual making home deliveries of newspapers or advertising;

taxi-cab drivers;

outside salespersons; and

students working during all or any part of the school year or regular vacation periods.

“Occupation,” an industry, trade, or business or branch thereof or class of work in which workers are gainfully employed.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 109

, eff. April 14, 1959;

1967, No. 177

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967;

1977, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 1, 1978;

1985, No. 80

, § 2;

1993, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), § 34;

2001, No. 47

, § 1;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 384.
Employment; wages.

An employer shall not employ any employee at a rate of less than $10.96. Beginning on January 1, 2021, an employer shall not employ any employee at a rate of less than $11.75. Beginning on January 1, 2022, an employer shall not employ any employee at a rate of less than $12.55, and on each subsequent January 1, the minimum wage rate shall be increased by five percent or the percentage increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. city average, not seasonally adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency for the 12 months preceding the previous September 1, whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the minimum wage be decreased. The minimum wage shall be rounded off to the nearest $0.01.
(a) (1) An employer shall not employ any employee at a rate of less than $10.96. Beginning on January 1, 2021, an employer shall not employ any employee at a rate of less than $11.75. Beginning on January 1, 2022, an employer shall not employ any employee at a rate of less than $12.55, and on each subsequent January 1, the minimum wage rate shall be increased by five percent or the percentage increase of the Consumer Price Index, CPI-U, U.S. city average, not seasonally adjusted, or successor index, as calculated by the U.S. Department of Labor or successor agency for the 12 months preceding the previous September 1, whichever is smaller, but in no event shall the minimum wage be decreased. The minimum wage shall be rounded off to the nearest $0.01.

An employer in the hotel, motel, tourist place, and restaurant industry shall not employ a service or tipped employee at a basic wage rate less than one-half the minimum wage. As used in this subsection, “a service or tipped employee” means an employee of a hotel, motel, tourist place, or restaurant who customarily and regularly receives more than $120.00 per month in tips for direct and personal customer service.

If the minimum wage rate established by the U.S. government is greater than the rate established for Vermont for any year, the minimum wage rate for that year shall be the rate established by the U.S. government.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an employer shall not pay an employee less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any work done by the employee in excess of 40 hours during a workweek. However, this subsection shall not apply to:

Employees of any retail or service establishment. A “retail or service establishment” means an establishment 75 percent of whose annual volume of sales of goods or services, or of both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales or services in the particular industry.

Employees of an establishment that is an amusement or recreational establishment, if:

it does not operate for more than seven months in any calendar year; or

during the preceding calendar year its average receipts for any six months of that year were not more than one-third of its average receipts for the other six months of the year.

Employees of an establishment that is a hotel, motel, or restaurant.

Employees of hospitals, public health centers, nursing homes, maternity homes, therapeutic community residences, and residential care homes as those terms are defined in Title 18, provided:

the employer pays the employee on a biweekly basis; and

the employer files an election to be governed by this section with the Commissioner; and

the employee receives not less than one and one-half times the regular wage rate for any work done by the employee:

in excess of eight hours for any workday; or

in excess of 80 hours for any biweekly period.

Those employees of a business engaged in the transportation of persons or property to whom the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act do not apply, but shall apply to all other employees of such businesses.

Those employees of a political subdivision of this State.

State employees who are covered by the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.

However, an employer may deduct from the rates required in subsections (a) and (b) of this section the amounts for board, lodging, apparel, rent, or utilities paid or furnished or other items or services or such other conditions or circumstances as may be usual in a particular employer-employee relationship, including gratuities as determined by the wage order made under this subchapter.

For the purposes of earned sick time, an employer shall comply with the provisions required under subchapter 4B of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 32

, eff. Sept. 1, 1959;

1965, No. 35

, § 1, eff. Oct. 1, 1965;

1967, No. 177

, § 2, eff. April 17, 1967;

1969, No. 67

, §§ 1, 2, eff. April 17, 1969;

1969, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.);

1971, No. 203

(Adj. Sess.);

1973, No. 265

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 16, 1974;

1977, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. May 1, 1978;

1985, No. 80

, § 1;

1987, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.);

1989, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 29, 1990;

1993, No. 227

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 33, 35;

1995, No. 150

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997;

1997, No. 4

, § 1;

1999, No. 21

, § 1, eff. May 13, 1999;

1999, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. May 18, 2000;

2003, No. 67

, § 25a;

2005, No. 82

, § 1;

2007, No. 78

, § 1;

2009, No. 54

, § 31; eff. June 1, 2009;

2013, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2015;

2015, No. 69

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2017;

2019, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 385.
Administration.

The Commissioner and the Commissioner’s authorized representatives have full power and authority for all the following:

To enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter, including the power to conduct investigations and take any other action considered necessary or suitable for the administration of this chapter. In the discharge of duties under this chapter, the Commissioner may administer oaths, take depositions, certify to official acts, subpoena witnesses, and compel production of any documents and records necessary and material to the administration of this chapter.

To enter and inspect any place of business or employment, question any employees, and investigate any records, facts, conditions, or matters that are deemed appropriate and that in any way appertain to or have a bearing upon the question of wages due under the provisions of this chapter.

To require from any employer full and correct statements in writing of the wages paid to all employees employed by that employer necessary to investigate and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

To recommend and determine the amount of deductions for board, lodging, or other items or services supplied by the employer or any other conditions or circumstances as may be usual in a particular employer-employee relationship, including gratuities; provided, however, that in no case shall the total remuneration received by an employee, including wages, board, lodging, or other items or services supplied by the employer, including gratuities, be less than the minimum wage rate set forth in section 384 of this title. No deduction may be made for the care, cleaning, or maintenance of required apparel. No deduction for required apparel shall be made without the employee’s express written authorization and the deduction shall not:

reduce the total remuneration received by an employee below the hourly minimum wage;

include any administrative fees or charges; or

amend, nullify, or violate the terms and conditions of any collective bargaining agreement.

To recommend a suitable scale of rates for learners, apprentices, and persons with disabilities, which may be less than the regular minimum wage rate for experienced workers without disabilities.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 47

, § 2;

2005, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. May 29, 2006;

2007, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. June 2, 2008.

§ 386.
Investigations.

The Commissioner may, and on a petition of 50 or more residents of the State shall, make an investigation of any industry, business, occupation, or employment as set forth in section 385 of this title, to ascertain whether any violations of this subchapter have occurred.

§ 387. Section 387 repealed effective July 1, 2026. Enforcement by Attorney General; employee misclassification.

Following the referral of a complaint by the Commissioner of Labor pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title, the Attorney General may investigate a complaint that an employer has committed a willful, substantial, or systemic violation of this subchapter by misclassifying an employee as an independent contractor and may enforce the provisions of this subchapter by restraining prohibited acts, seeking civil penalties, obtaining assurances of discontinuance, and conducting civil investigations in accordance with the procedures established in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

as though the misclassification of an employee is an unfair act in commerce. Any employer complained against shall have the same rights and remedies as specified in

9 V.S.A. §§ 2458

-2461

. The Superior Court may impose the same civil penalties and investigation costs and order other relief to the State of Vermont or an aggrieved employee for the misclassification of an employee and any related violations of the provisions of this chapter as they are authorized to impose or order under the provisions of 9 V.S.A. §§ 2458 and 2461 in an unfair act in commerce. In addition, the Superior Court may order restitution of wages or other benefits on behalf of an employee and may order reinstatement and other appropriate relief on behalf of an employee.

The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.
(b) (1) The Attorney General shall share information and coordinate investigatory and enforcement resources with the Departments of Financial Regulation, of Labor, and of Taxes pursuant to the provisions of section 3 of this title.

Upon receiving notice that the Attorney General has determined that an employer has committed a violation of this subchapter by misclassifying an employee as an independent contractor, the Commissioners of Financial Regulation and of Taxes shall review whether the employer is in compliance with the insurance or tax laws that are under their jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Feb. 20, 2020; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 217; repealed on July 1, 2026 by

2019, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 11(b).

§§ 388-390a.
Repealed. 1995, No. 188 (Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 390.
Repealed. 2001, No. 47, § 8.

§ 390a.
Repealed. 2001, No. 47, § 3.

§ 391.
Modification of wage orders.

The Commissioner with the approval of the Governor may from time to time propose modifications of or additions to any regulations included in any minimum wage order which the Commissioner deems appropriate.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 47

, § 4.

§ 392.
Court proceedings.

If any employer covered by a wage order has failed to comply with the wage order within 14 days after receiving notification of the violation, the Commissioner shall take court action to enforce the order.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2001, No. 47

, § 5;

2017, No. 11

, § 51.

§ 393.
Employers’ records.

Every employer, subject to the provisions of this subchapter or of any regulation or order issued thereunder, shall keep a true and accurate record of the hours worked by each employee and of the wages paid to him or her and shall furnish to the Commissioner upon demand a sworn statement of the same.
Such records shall be open to inspection by the Commissioner, his or her deputy, or any authorized agent of the Department at any reasonable time.
Every employer subject to the provisions of this subchapter or of any regulation or order issued under the provisions thereof shall keep a copy of them posted in a conspicuous place in the area where employees are employed. The Commissioner shall furnish copies of such orders and regulations to employers without charge.

§ 394.
Penalties.

Any employer, subject to this subchapter or any regulations or orders issued thereunder, or any of the employer’s agents or the officer or agent of any corporation who pays or permits to be paid or agrees to pay to any employee engaged in any industry or occupation less than the applicable rate to which the employee is entitled under this subchapter, shall be fined not more than $100.00 for each day the employee is paid less than the rate required under this subchapter.

Any employer or any of the employer’s agents or the officer or agent of any corporation who fails to keep the records required under this subchapter or refuses to permit the Commissioner to enter the place of business or who fails to furnish the records to the Commissioner upon demand shall be fined not more than $100.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 47

, § 6.

§ 395.
Civil actions.

If any employee is paid by an employer less than the applicable wage rate to which the employee is entitled under this subchapter, the employee shall recover, in a civil action, twice the amount of the minimum wage less any amount actually paid by the employer, together with costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, and any agreement between an employer and an employee to work for less than the wage rates is no defense to the action.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 47

, § 7.

§ 396.
Appeals from Commissioner’s decisions.

Appeals to Superior Court wherein a civil action between the parties would be triable. Any person aggrieved by any decision of the Commissioner may appeal to the Superior Court.

Procedure. The court shall direct the record in the matter appealed from to be laid before it, hear the evidence, and make such order approving in whole or in part or setting aside in whole or in part the decision appealed from as justice may require, and may refer any matter or issue arising in the proceedings to the Commissioner for further consideration. However, in no case shall such an appeal operate as a supersedeas or stay unless the Commissioner or the court to which such appeal is taken shall so order.

Certifying record. An order of court to send up the record may be complied with by filing either the original papers or duly certified copies thereof, or of such portions thereof as the order may specify, together with a certified statement of such other facts as show the grounds of the action appealed from.

Hearing. The court may take evidence or may appoint a referee to take such evidence as it may direct and to report the same with findings of fact.

Costs. In any proceedings under this subchapter, the court may make such award of costs as may seem equitable and just.

Appeal, Supreme Court. Appeal from the decision of the Superior Court may be had to the Supreme Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 193, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

§ 397.
Retaliation prohibited.

An employer shall not discharge or in any other manner retaliate against an employee because:

the employee lodged a complaint of a violation of this subchapter;

the employee has cooperated with the Commissioner in an investigation of a violation of this subchapter; or

the employer believes that the employee may lodge a complaint or cooperate in an investigation of a violation of this subchapter.

Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring an action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court seeking compensatory and punitive damages or equitable relief, including restraint of prohibited acts, restitution of wages or benefits, reinstatement, costs, reasonable attorney’s fees, and other appropriate relief.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 15

, § 9.